Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.900

Construction—Severability—1935 c 143.

This chapter and all its provisions shall be liberally construed to the end that the purposes hereof may be made effective. If any section, part or provision of this chapter shall be adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional, such adjudication shall not affect the validity of the chapter as a whole, or of any section, provision or part thereof not adjudged invalid or unconstitutional.

[ 1935 c 143 s 11; RRS s 5608-11.]